Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 34. Rules of Construction

38-34-101.
General policy regarding titles.

It is the purpose and intention of this article and article 35, part 2 of article 39, and part 1 of article 41 of this title to render titles to real property and every interest therein more secure and marketable, and it is declared to be the policy in this state that this article and all other laws concerning or affecting title to real property and every interest therein and all recorded instruments, decrees, and orders of courts of record, including all proceedings in the suits or causes wherein such orders or decrees have been entered or rendered, shall be liberally construed with the end in view of rendering such titles absolute and free from technical defects so that subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers by way of mortgage, judgment, or otherwise may rely on the record title and so that the record title of the party in possession is sustained and not defeated by technical or strict constructions.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 605, § 44.

CSA:

C. 40, § 151.

CRS 53:

§ 118-8-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-8-1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 2185, § 65, effective June 2.

38-34-102.
Official name as part of signature.

Where, from the body of an instrument, it is apparent that a person is conveying or is acting in some official or representative capacity and the signature to the instrument omits the statement of the official or representative capacity, it shall be presumed that the official or representative capacity is a part of the signature.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 605, § 45.

CSA:

C. 40, § 152.

CRS 53:

§ 118-8-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-8-2.

38-34-103.
Building or use restrictions strictly construed.

Building restrictions and all restrictions as to the use or occupancy of real property shall be strictly construed, and restrictions which provide for the forfeiture or defeasance of title to or an interest in real property because of the violation of the restrictions on other real property and if the parcels of real property are owned by different persons or individuals shall be construed as applying only to the property embraced in the restriction and owned by the party on whose property the violation of the restriction occurred.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 606, § 46.

CSA:

C. 40, § 153.

CRS 53:

§ 118-8-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-8-3.

38-34-104.
Death of trustee.

Upon the death of a sole trustee or the surviving trustee of an express trust created by any written instrument affecting title to real property, the trust shall not descend to the heirs of such trustee nor pass to his personal representative, but the trust if then unexecuted shall vest in the then public trustee and his successors in office of the county wherein the real estate is situate, with all powers of the original trustee. The district court may, upon application of any party in interest, appoint a new trustee except in such cases where by law or by the instrument a successor in trust is provided, and in such cases the trust shall vest in such successor.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 606, § 48.

CSA:

C. 40, § 155.

CRS 53:

§ 118-8-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-8-5.

38-34-105.
When deed transferred before formation - definitions.

If a grantee described in a deed as an entity has not been formed at the time of the delivery of the deed to the grantee, the title to the real property described in the deed vests in the grantee when the entity is formed, and no other instrument of conveyance is required.

As used in this section:

“Entity” has the meaning specified in section 7-90-102 (20), C.R.S.

“Formed” has the meaning specified in section 7-90-102 (29.5), C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 607, § 49.

CSA:

C. 40, § 156.

CRS 53:

§ 118-8-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-8-6.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-049), ch. 72, p. 192, § 1, effective August 5.

38-34-106.
When corporate existence expires.

When the corporate existence of any corporation having an interest in real property expires and there is an attempted renewal or extension of its corporate existence either within the time provided for by law or thereafter, a conveyance thereafter by such purported corporation vests in the grantee the interest of the former corporation, and where such cases have occurred prior to March 28, 1927, the title or interest so conveyed shall be presumed to have been properly passed to the grantee.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 607, § 50.

CSA:

C. 40, § 157.

CRS 53:

§ 118-8-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-8-7.